Utah statutes.
13-32-103.   Prohibited sales.
A vendor who is not a manufacturer's or distributor's representative shall not
sell or offer for sale or exchange at a swap meet or flea market any:
(1)  food product which is manufactured and packaged specifically for
consumption by a child under two years of age;
(2)  nonprescription or over-the-counter drug or medication other than herbal
products, dietary supplements, botanical extracts, or vitamins; or
(3)  cosmetic or personal care product which has an expiration date.
